Nevada, session 83, SB319.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. 1. The Washoe County Board of County
Commissioners shall, by interlocal agreement adopted in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 277.080 to 277.180, inclusive, establish
a board to study the creation of a county fire protection district to
consolidate fire protection services within territory within Washoe
County and the Cities of Reno and Sparks. Washoe County and the
Cities of Reno and Sparks shall share the costs of the study, the
costs of any additional consultants and experts and any other cost
necessary to conduct the study.
2. The board established pursuant to subsection 1 must be
composed of:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) Two members of the Washoe County Board of County
Commissioners, appointed by the Washoe County Board of County
Commissioners;
(b) Two members of the Reno City Council, appointed by the
Reno City Council; and
(c) Two members of the Sparks City Council, appointed by the
Sparks City Council.
3. The board shall:
(a) Evaluate the impact a consolidated county fire protection
district will have on the response times, preparation and costs of
providing fire protection services in Washoe County and the Cities
of Reno and Sparks;
(b) Determine any legal mechanisms necessary to consolidate
fire service between the County and the Cities;
(c) Determine any assessments necessary to support the district;
(d) Determine and review the amount of any debt and liabilities
of each former fire protection district or fire department
consolidated into a county fire protection district for the purposes of
determining how any such debt and liabilities may be settled or
paid;
(e) Evaluate any potential impacts on policies of insurance for
fire;
(f) Perform any other acts necessary, proper and convenient to
accomplish the purposes of this section; and
(g) Not later than December 31, 2026, prepare a written report
for transmission to the Washoe County Board of County
Commissioners, Reno City Council and Sparks City Council with
the results and recommendations of the board and any
recommendations for legislation.
4. A majority of members constitutes a quorum at any meeting.
Any action of the board must be approved by a majority of members
and at least one member appointed by each participating governing
body.
5. The board may contract with other entities to assist the board
in carrying out the requirements of this section.
6. The board established pursuant to subsection 1 is a public
body and is subject to the requirements set forth in chapter 241 of
NRS.
Secs. 15.5 and 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 18. 1. This section and sections 15.5 and 17 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 15 of this act becomes effective upon passage and
approval and expires by limitation on July 1, 2027.
3. Sections 1 to 14, inclusive, and 16 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2027.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)